hu: Ivókészlet kristály összetétele: Boroszilikát üveg; Ólomkristály; Ólommentes kristály; Nátronüveg; Egyéb
zh-CN: 饮具水晶材质成分: 硼硅玻璃; 含铅水晶; 无铅水晶; 钠钙玻璃; 其他
pt-BR: Composição do cristal dos utensílios para bebidas: Vidro borossilicato; Cristal de chumbo; Cristal sem chumbo; Vidro sódio-cálcico; Outro
ja: 飲用容器のクリスタル組成: ホウケイ酸ガラス; リードクリスタル; 無鉛クリスタル; ソーダ石灰ガラス; その他
nl: Samenstelling van het kristalglas: Hittebestendig glas; Loodkristal; Loodvrij kristal; Soda-lime-glas; Overig
da: Drikkeglassenes krystalsammensætning: Borosilikatglas; Blykrystal; Blyfri krystal; Sodalime-glas; Andet
it: Composizione di cristalli per bicchieri: Vetro borosilicato; Cristallo al piombo; Cristallo senza piombo; Vetro sodico-calcico; Altro
ko: 음료용기 크리스털 구성: 붕규산 유리; 리드 크리스탈; 무연 크리스탈; 소다석회 유리; 기타
fi: Juomalasien kidekoostumus: Borosilikaattilasi; Lyijykristalli; Lyijytön kristalli; Natronkalkkilasi; Muu
fr: Composition du verre ou du cristal: Verre borosilicate; Cristal au plomb; Cristal sans plomb; Verre sodocalcique; Autre
ru: Состав хрусталя посуды для напитков: Боросиликатное стекло; С содержанием свинца; Без содержания свинца; Натриево-кальциевое стекло; Другой
pt-PT: Composição do cristal dos copos: Vidro borossilicato; Cristal com chumbo; Cristal sem chumbo; Vidro de cal sodada; Outro
es: Composición de cristal para vasos y copas: Vidrio de borosilicato; Vidrio de plomo; Vidrio sin plomo; Vidrio sódico-cálcico; Otros
nb: Krystallkomposisjon for drikkevarer: Borsilikatglass; Blykrystall; Blyfritt krystall; Soda-lime glass; Annet
en: Drinkware crystal composition: Borosilicate glass; Lead crystal; Lead-free crystal; Soda-lime glass; Other
zh-TW: 飲具水晶成分: 硼矽酸鹽玻璃; 鉛水晶; 無鉛水晶; 鈉鈣玻璃; 其他
de: Kristallzusammensetzung des Trinkgefäßes: Borosilikatglas; Bleikristall; Bleifreies Kristall; Kalk-Natron-Glas; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Състав на кристалните съдове за напитки: Боросиликатно стъкло; Кристал с олово; Кристал без олово; Сода-варово стъкло; Друго
lt-LT: Gėrimų indų krištolo sudėtis: Borosilikatinis stiklas; Švininis krištolas; Krištolas be švino; Natrio-kalkių stiklas; Kita
pl: Skład kryształowych naczyń do picia: Szkło borokrzemowe; Kryształ ołowiowy; Kryształ bezołowiowy; Szkło sodowo-wapniowe; Pozostałe
sv: Kristallsammansättning i dricksglas: Borosilikatglas; Blykristall; Blyfri kristall; Soda-limeglas; Övrigt
el: Σύνθεση κρυστάλλου σκευών ποτού: Βοριοπυριτικό γυαλί; Κρύσταλλο με μόλυβδο; Κρύσταλλο χωρίς μόλυβδο; Γυαλί ασβεστονατρίου (soda-lime); Άλλο
hr-HR: Sastav kristala posuđa za napitke: Borosilikatno staklo; Kristal s olovom; Kristal bez olova; Natrijevo staklo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Sestava kristala kozarcev: Borosilkatno steklo; Svinčev kristal; Kristal brez svinca; Natrijevo-kalcijevo steklo; Druga
sk-SK: Zloženie krištáľov na poháre: Borosilikátové sklo; Olovnatý krištáľ; Bezolovnatý krištáľ; Sodno-vápenaté sklo; Iné
tr: İçecek takımı kristal kompozisyonu: Borosilikat cam; Kurşunlu kristal; Kurşunsuz kristal; Soda-kireç camı; Diğer
cs: Složení křišťálového nápojového skla: Borosilikátové sklo; Olovnatý křišťál; Bezolovnatý křišťál; Sodnovápenaté sklo; Jiné
th: ส่วนประกอบแก้วคริสตัลในทำภาชนะเครื่องดื่ม: แก้วบอโรซิลิเคท; แก้วคริสตัลตะกั่ว; แก้วคริสตัลปลอดสารตะกั่ว; แก้วโซดาไลม์; อื่นๆ
vi: Thành phần pha lê của đồ uống: Thủy tinh borosilicat; Pha lê có chì; Pha lê không chì; Thủy tinh soda-vôi; Khác
ro-RO: Compoziția cristalului recipientelor de băut: Sticlă borosilicată; Cristal cu plumb; Cristal fără plumb; Sticlă sodocalcică; Altele